Louisiana, session 2026, HB630.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Civil Code Article 2502 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
Art. 2502. Transfer of rights to a thing
A. A person may transfer to another whatever all the rights to a thing he may
then have, without warranting the existence of any such rights to a thing. In such a
case the The transferor does shall not owe restitution of the price to the transferee in
case of eviction, nor may that and the transfer shall not be rescinded for lesion.
B. Such a The transfer does not give rise to establish a presumption of bad
faith on the part of by the transferee and is a just title for the purposes of acquisitive
prescription.
C. If the transferor acquires ownership of the thing after having transferred
his rights to it, the after-acquired title of the transferor does not inure to the benefit
of the transferee.
D. Instruments that are without effect as to third persons pursuant to Article
3338 are without effect to the transferee of rights to a thing.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1264 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 630